Wisconsin, session 2025, AB273.
do enact as follows:AB273,1Section 1. 15.405 (5g) of the statutes is amended to read:15.405 (5g) Controlled substances board. There is created in the department of safety and professional services a controlled substances board consisting of the attorney general, the secretary of health services, and the secretary of agriculture, trade and consumer protection, or their designees; the chairperson of the pharmacy examining board, the chairperson of the medical examining board, the chairperson of the physician assistant affiliated credentialing board, the chairperson of the dentistry examining board, and the chairperson of the board of nursing, or a designee; and one psychiatrist and one pharmacologist appointed for 3-year terms. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/ab273 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/ab273 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB273 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB273 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»AB273: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting